Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 268B.29, is amended to read: 268B.29 SMALL EMPLOYER ASSISTANCE GRANTS. (a) Employers with 30 or fewer employees as calculated under section 268B.14, subdivision 5b, and an average wage for that employer under section 268B.14, subdivision 5c, less than or equal to 150 percent of the state's average wage in covered employment for the prior year may apply to the department for grants under this section. (b) The commissioner may approve a grant of up to $3,000 if the employer hires a temporary worker, or increases another existing worker's wages, to substitute for an employee on family or medical leave for a period of seven days or more. (c) The maximum total grant per eligible employer in a calendar year is $6,000. (d) Grants must be used to hire temporary workers or to increase wages for current employees. To be eligible for consideration for a grant under this section, the employer must documentation attest, in a manner and format prescribed by the commissioner, that: (1) the temporary worker hired or wage-related costs incurred are due to an employee's use of leave under this chapter; (2) the amount of the grant requested is less than or equal to the additional costs incurred by the employer; and (3) the employer meets the revenue requirements in paragraph (a). (e) Applications shall be submitted and processed in a form and manner determined by the commissioner within each calendar year until funding is exhausted. Applications received after funding has been exhausted in a calendar year are not eligible for reimbursement. deleted text begin (f) An employer who has an approved private plan is not eligible to receive a grant under this section. deleted text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Unless additional funds are appropriated, the commissioner may award grants under this section up to a maximum of $5,000,000 per calendar year from the family and medical benefit insurance account. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end